Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

26-1-1.
Maintenance of information and referral service for persons and organizations desiring to donate food to nonprofit organizations; inspection of donated food.

The Department of Agriculture shall maintain an information and referral service for persons and organizations which have notified the department of their desire to donate food to nonprofit organizations.

Appropriate state and local departments and agencies are authorized to inspect donated food items for wholesomeness and may establish procedures for the handling of the food items.

History.

Code 1933, § 105-1106, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 69, § 1.

Cross references.

Liability of persons donating food for use or distribution by nonprofit organizations, § 51-1-31.

Law reviews.

For article, “Consolidation by Compact: A Remedy for Preemption of State Food and Drug Laws,” see 14 J. Pub. L. 276 (1965).